dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -ér inregolari: (des|re)?(t[iu]?|c)o[lƚ]er, (ben|mal|re)?(vu?|’)o[lƚ]er
# changes in indicative present, indicative future, subjunctive present, conditional present, imperative present, infinitive simple, participle passive, gerund simple
# NOTA: del congiuntivo sono note le forme in tòja
# NOTE: see also other derivations in dic file!
SFX xF Y 98
SFX xF oler òs/I3 oler	vt:indicative+present is:second is:singular	# T8 + is
SFX xF oler òga/I5I7 oler	vt:indicative+present is:third	# T10
SFX xF oler ògi/I5I7 oler	vt:indicative+present is:third	# T10, đulian
SFX xF ler rò/I1 oler	vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[òàè]
SFX xF ler rà/I1 oler	vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[òàè]
SFX xF ler rè/I1 oler	vt:indicative+future is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[òàè]
SFX xF ler rom/I2 oler	vt:indicative+future is:first is:plural	# T4 + r[éí]mo, pavan
SFX xF ler remo/I2 oler	vt:indicative+future is:first is:plural	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xF ler rimo/I2 oler	vt:indicative+future is:first is:plural	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xF ler ron/I2 oler	vt:indicative+future is:first is:plural	# T4 + rón
SFX xF ler ren/I2 oler	vt:indicative+future is:first is:plural	# T4 + rén
SFX xF ler rà/I3 oler	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]
SFX xF ler ré/I3 oler	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]
SFX xF ler ras/I3 oler	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]s
SFX xF ler res/I3 oler	vt:indicative+future is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[àé]s
SFX xF ler rè/I4 oler	vt:indicative+future is:second is:plural	# T4 + r[èéí]
SFX xF ler ré/I4 oler	vt:indicative+future is:second is:plural	# T4 + r[èéí], arkade
SFX xF ler rí/I4 oler	vt:indicative+future is:second is:plural	# T4 + r[èéí]
SFX xF ler rà oler	vt:indicative+future is:third	# T4 + rà
SFX xF ler ría oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rí[ae]/réa
SFX xF ler rea oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rí[ae]/réa, veronexe
SFX xF ler résimo/I2 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r[éí]simo
SFX xF ler rísino/I2 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r[éí]simo, pavan
SFX xF ler rísimo/I2 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r[éí]simo, paduan
SFX xF ler ría/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ría
SFX xF ler rías/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ría
SFX xF ler risi/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rísi, paduan, arkade
SFX xF ler rísis/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rísi, paduan, arkade
SFX xF er aresi/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rési
SFX xF er arésis/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rési
SFX xF ler resi/I4 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + rési
SFX xF ler risi/I4 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + rísi, paduan, arkade
SFX xF ler rié/I4 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + r(is)ié, baso belumat, seguxinexe, cipileño
SFX xF ler risié/I4 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + r(is)ié, baso belumat, seguxinexe, cipileño
SFX xF ler ría oler	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rí[ae]/réa
SFX xF ler rea oler	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rí[ae]/réa, veronexe
SFX xF ler rave/I1 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xF ler rae oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xF ler ravi/I1 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei], paduan
SFX xF ler rai oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei], paduan
SFX xF ler rave oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xF ler rae oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xF ler ron/I2P4 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(s[ei])
SFX xF ler rion/I2P4 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(s[ei])
SFX xF ler rison/I2P4 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(s[ei])
SFX xF ler rision/I2P4 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r(is)(i)ón(s[ei])
SFX xF ler ren/I2P4 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r(is)én(s[ei])
SFX xF ler risen/I2P4 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + r(is)én(s[ei])
SFX xF ler rave/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xF ler ràves/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei], pavan
SFX xF ler rae oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xF ler ravi/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei], paduan
SFX xF ler rai oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + rà(v)[ei], paduan
SFX xF ler ree/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e
SFX xF ler rées/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e
SFX xF ler rèe/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe
SFX xF ler rèes/I3 oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe
SFX xF ler rave oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xF ler rae oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xF ler rave oler	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xF ler rae oler	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)[ei]
SFX xF ler ríe oler	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rí[ae]
SFX xF ler ree oler	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + r[èé]e
SFX xF ler rèe oler	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe
SFX xF ler rove oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xF ler roe oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xF ler rove oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xF ler roe oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xF ler rove oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xF ler roe oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xF ler rove oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xF ler roe oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xF ler rove/I5 oler	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xF ler roe/I5 oler	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró(v)e
SFX xF ler rou oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + róu
SFX xF ler ree/I1 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e
SFX xF ler rèe/I1 oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + r[èé]e, ŧenedexe
SFX xF ler ríe oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + rí[ae]
SFX xF ler rou oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + róu
SFX xF ler rou oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + róu
SFX xF ler rou oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + róu
SFX xF ler rou/I5 oler	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + róu
SFX xF ler roo oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + róo
SFX xF ler roo oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + róo
SFX xF ler roo oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + róo
SFX xF ler roo oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + róo
SFX xF ler roo/I5 oler	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + róo
SFX xF ler ró oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:singular	# T4 + ró
SFX xF ler ró oler	vt:conditional+present is:first is:plural	# T4 + ró
SFX xF ler ró oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:singular	# T4 + ró
SFX xF ler ró oler	vt:conditional+present is:second is:plural	# T4 + ró
SFX xF ler ró/I5 oler	vt:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ró
SFX xF oler òr/BuP0P1P2 oler	vt:infinitive+simple	# T1 + r(e)
SFX xF oler òre oler	vt:infinitive+simple	# T1 + r(e), padoan/coxòto
SFX xF ler r/BuP0P1P2 oler	vt:infinitive+simple	# T1 + r(e)
