dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/venetan.dic
tioler/T0T1T2T3T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3W2P0P1xDxFxG-1.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
toler/T0T1T2T3T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3W2P0P1xDxFxG-1.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
tuoler/T0T1T2T3T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3W2P0P1xDxFxG-1.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
voler/T0T1T2T3T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3W2P0P1xExFxGxI'0^8^7.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
voler/T0T1T2T3T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3W2P0P1xExFxGxI	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple is:apheresis st:voler
vuoler/T0T1T2T3T8N0N1N2N3N4L1L2L3W2P0P1xExFxGxI'0^8^7.0	po:verb vt:infinitive+simple
